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DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE
DTC P0325/52 | Knock Sensor 1 Circuit Malfunction
DTC P0330/55 | Knock Sensor 2 Circuit Malfunction
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Knock sensors are fitted one to the right bank and left bank of the cylinder block to detect engine knocking.
This sensor contains a piezoelectric element which generates a voltage when it becomes deformed, which
occurs when the cylinder block vibrates due to knocking. If engine knocking occurs, ignition timing is retarded
to suppress it.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
No knock sensor 1 signal to engine ECU with engine speed »Openorshortinknock sensor1 circuit
P0325/52 ¢ Knock sensor 1 (looseness)
between 1,700 rpm and 5,400 rpm )
*EngineECU
No knock sensor 2 signal to engine ECU with engine speed »Openorshortinknock sensor2 circuit
P0330/55 * Knock sensor 2 (looseness)
between 1,700 rpm and 5,400 rpm )
*EngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

. DTCP0325/52isforthe left bank knock sensor circuit.

. DTC P0330/55is forthe right bank knock sensor circuit.

. Readfreezeframedatausinghand -heldtester. Becausefreeze framerecordsthe engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air —fuelratioleanorrich, etc. atthetime
of the malfunction.

Whenusing hand -heldtester

1 Connecthand -heldtesterand check knock sensor circuit.

PREPARATION:
_ (@) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
E”w (b) Disconnect the wire to wire connector EC1.
Connect the terminals of the disconnected EC1 male con-

EC1 (C)
Knock Sensor
@1 2 2 G ol nector and EC1 female as follows.

18 | KNKL
- Male connector <= Female connector

1 17| KNKR Terminal1 <> Terminal2
i ._I ED ED) = Terminal2 <> Terminal 1

Male 33 Female

Connector  Connector (d) Turnignition switch ON and switch the hand -heldtester

main switch ON.
(e) After the engine is warmed up, perform quick racing to

EC1 4,000 rpm three times.
I CHECK:
Check the DTC.
RESULT:
T | DTC same as when vehicle brought in.
ype P0325/52 — P0325/520r P0330/55 — P0330/55
nggé)g 202439 T " DTC different to when vehicle brought in.
ype P0325/52 — P0330/550r P0330/55 — P0325/52
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KNK signal waveform
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Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
. With the engine racing (4,000 rpm) measure between ter-
minal KNK1, KNK2 of the engine ECU connector and
body ground.
HINT:
The correct waveforms are as shown.

. Spread the time on the horizontal axis, and confirm that
period of the wave is 0.13 m sec.
(Normal mode vibration frequency of knock sensor:
8.1 kHz)
HINT:
If normal mode vibration frequency is not 8.1 kHz, the sensor
is malfunctioning.

Type> Go to step 3.

2Checkforopenand shortin harness and connector between EC 1 connectorand
engine ECU (See page IN-19).

@

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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Check for open and short in harness and connector between EC1 connector and
knock sensor (See page IN-19).

HINT:

. IfDTC P0325/52 has changedto P0330/55, check the knock sensor circuitonthe left bank side.
. IfDTC P0330/55 has changed to P0325/52, check the knock sensor circuitonthe right bank side.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

Replace knock sensor.

Whennotusinghand -heldtester

1 Check continuity between terminal KNKR, KNKL of engine ECU connector and
body ground.
75\ ON PREPARATION:
/ K'/\‘K'- (+) KNKR (+) (@) Remove the glove compartment door.
2 (b) Disconnect the E7 connector of engine ECU.
CHECK:

BE6653
A05830

Measure resistance between terminal KNKR, KNKL of engine
ECU connector and body ground.

OK:

= @ ) Resistance: 1 MQ or higher

A05997
OK Go to step 3.

@
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2 Check knock sensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect knock sensor connector.
CHECK:

Measure resistance between the knock sensor terminal and
body.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ or higher

FI16630

NG> Replace knock sensor.

@

3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
knock sensor (See page IN-19).

3

4 | Does malfunction disappear when a good knock sensor is installed?

@

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

YES> Replace knock sensor.
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